Utah statutes.
56-1-8.   Use of local streets.
No railroad shall use any road, street, alley or highway within any county,
city or town except with the consent of the authorities of such county, city
or town as provided by law; provided, that this section shall not be construed
to prevent railroads from crossing at right angles, or as nearly as may be,
any street, alley or highway across which its located line may pass.
